dictionaries/ennl.aff
FLAG long
REP persentage percentage
REP deja-vu déjà_vu


# no minimum chars for compounding (just don't flag the dangerous ones)
COMPOUNDMIN 0

# COMPOUNDING RULES FOR NUMBERS IN TEXT

#N1 = eenen, tweeën etc
#N2 = twintig .. negentig
#N3 = een .. negentien
COMPOUNDRULE 37
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(n2)	  	# eenen+zestig[ste]
COMPOUNDRULE (Nh)(n3)		# honderden+twee[de]
COMPOUNDRULE (Nh)(n2)		# honderden+twintig[ste]
COMPOUNDRULE (Nh)(N1)(n2)	# honderden+eenen+dertig
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(NH)		# vijf+honderd 
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(n3)	# vijf+honderden+een 
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(n2)	# vijf+honderd+twintig 
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(N1)(n2)	# vijf+honderd+eenen+zestig
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nd)		# vijf+duizend
COMPOUNDRULE (N2)(Nd)		# zestig+duizend[ste]
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)	# eenen+zestig+honderd
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(n3)	
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(N1)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (NH)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (NH)(N3)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (NH)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(N3)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nh)(N1)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (NH)(N1)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(NH)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(N3)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N4)(Nh)(N1)(N2)(Nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(NH)(Nd)	# eenentwintighonderdduizend
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nj)   	# eenen+zestig+jarig
COMPOUNDRULE (N3)(Nj)   	# acht+jarig
COMPOUNDRULE (N2)(Nj)   	# twintig+jarig
COMPOUNDRULE (N1)(N2)(Nj) 	# eenen+zestig+jarig
COMPOUNDRULE (G1)(G0)(NJ)  	# 12-jarig~
COMPOUNDRULE (G1)(G0)(G0)(NJ)  	# 102-jarig~
COMPOUNDRULE (G1)(NJ)  		# 8-jarig~
COMPOUNDRULE (Sv)(Sn)		# -straat, -plein etc.
COMPOUNDRULE (Ll)(Hp)(Lr)	# Nederlands-Ghanese
COMPOUNDRULE (Ll)(Hp)(Ll)(Le)	# Nederlands-Duits+e


# don't compound on case-different word borders
CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE

# general compounding
COMPOUNDBEGIN Ca
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Cb
COMPOUNDEND Cc
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Cp
ONLYINCOMPOUND Cx

# the following part might actually evolve to collision flags
# CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /C1 /C2
# but this does not function yet with this kind of compounding

# /C1 = needs hyphen after a / klinkerbotsing met a
# /C2 = needs hyphen after e / klinkerbotsing met e
# /C3 = needs hyphen after i / klinkerbotsing met i
# /C4 = needs hyphen after o / klinkerbotsing met o
# /C5 = needs hyphen after u / klinkerbotsing met u

# FIRST CHAR OF WORD PARTS AND CORRESPONDING FLAGS
# a => /C1
# e => /C1C2C3C4
# i => /C1C2C3C4C5
# o => /C4
# u => /C1C2C3C4C5
# j => /C3

# pattern checks
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP
# checkcompoundrep does not work as desired.
#CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# preventing unwanted compounds
# not all chars of colliding parts can be used !
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 50
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /Ch /Xc		# prevent training+s+port
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /Cd /Xc
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN a /C1		# klinkerbotsingen
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN e /C2
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN é /C2
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN i /C3
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN o /C4
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN u /C5
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /Xf /Xf		# moeder-dochter etc
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oon zor          	# woon-zorgflat 
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN armte krach	# warmte-krachtcentrale
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aag dar		# maag-darmandoening
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aagd ar          	# maag-darmandoening
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN hart long          # hart-longmachine
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN woon werk          # woon-werkverkeer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN man vrouw		# man-vrouwverhouding
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oofd hal		# hoofd hals
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN rts patiën		# arts-patiënt
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aten koste		# baten-kosten
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN eroepskracht kin	# beroepskracht kind
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oel midde		# doel middel
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN osis effec		# dosis effect
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aat liefd		# haat liefde
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN uur verhuu		# huur verhuur
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN lant leverancie	# klant leverancier
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN waliteit prĳ	# kwaliteit prĳs
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN rĳs kwalitei	# prĳs kwaliteit
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN eidster kin	# leidster kind
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN isico rendemen	# risico rendement
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ignaal rui		# signaal ruis
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent docen	# student docent
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent sta		# student staf
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent compute	# student computer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN raag aanbo		# vraag aanbod
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN erkgever werkneme	# werkgever werknemer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN achelor maste	# bachelor master
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN k ker              # voorkomt bakkeren en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN en loo             # voorkomt wolken+loos(t) en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN en loze            # voorkomt wolken+loze(r) en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ios ko            	# voorkomt bios+koop
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN e ring             # voorkomt subsidie+ring
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN urger meeste	# burgemeester
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN uis vestin		# voorkomt huis+vesting+ waar het huisvesting+s+ moet zijn
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN linden dar		# voorkomt blindendarm
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN r ring		# voorkomt erring
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN p pĳn        # voorkomt step+pijn
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN m mĳn
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN l lĳn
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN p peen
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN p poen

# FLAG FOR FIRST WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART OF COMPOUND AND HAVE AN S WHEN COMPOUNDED
# (unfortunately, I haven't found a method to suppress the affix s at the compound end
#  also, there is no method as far as I know to make affixes specific for a compound flag)

# accept an optional  - when compounding, first part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CA Y 2
SFX CA 0 /CaCp	
SFX CA 0 -/CaCp	

# accept an optional - when compounding, middle part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CB Y 2
SFX CB 0 /CbCp	
SFX CB 0 -/CbCp	

# for words that have a plural s and an s when compounding
# the second one allows for the optional hyphen
SFX Cd Y 2
SFX Cd 0 s/CaCbCcCp .  
SFX Cd 0 s-/CaCbCcCp . 

# for reasons of good results, parts that could have a compounding s
# but no plural s
# have to have separate (!) entries in the dictionary
# using the Ch flag 
SFX Ch Y 2
SFX Ch 0 s/CaCbCxCp .	
SFX Ch 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .	

# FLAG FOR WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART AND COULD HAVE A HYPHEN BECAUSE OF SONANT COLLISIONS (END WITH A, E, I, O, U)
SFX Ce Y 2
SFX Ce 0 /CaCbCp .	
SFX Ce 0 -/CaCbCcCp .	

# FLAGS FOR LETTERWORDS AND WORD THAT NEED A HYPHEN WHEN COMPOUNDING
SFX Cl Y 1
SFX Cl 0 -/CaCbCp .

PFX Cw Y 1
PFX Cw 0 -/CbCcCp .

# FLAGS FOR NOUN DIMINITIVES 
# tuin=>tuintje
SFX Ya Y 3
SFX Ya 0 tje .				ts:NN1r
SFX Ya 0 tjes/CaCbCp .			ts:NN2r
SFX Ya 0 tjes-/CaCbCp .			ts:NN2r 

# huis=>huisje
SFX Yb Y 6
SFX Yb 0 je [^m]			ts:NN1r
SFX Yb 0 jes/CaCbCp [^m] 		ts:NN2r
SFX Yb 0 jes-/CaCbCp [^m] 		ts:NN2r
SFX Yb 0 pje [m]			ts:NN1r
SFX Yb 0 pjes/CaCbCp [m]		ts:NN1r
SFX Yb 0 pjes-/CaCbCp [m]		ts:NN1r

# opleiding=>opleidinkje
SFX Yc Y 3
SFX Yc g kje .				ts:NN1r
SFX Yc g kjes/CaCbCp .			ts:NN2r
SFX Yc g kjes-/CaCbCp .			ts:NN2r

# ding=>dingetje
SFX Yd Y 3
SFX Yd 0 etje .				ts:NN1r
SFX Yd 0 etjes/CaCbCp .			ts:NN2r
SFX Yd 0 etjes-/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2r

# auto=>autootje
SFX Ye Y 15
SFX Ye 0 atje a				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 utje u				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 otje o				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 etje i				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye é eetje é			ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 atjes/CaCbCp a			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 atjes-/CaCbCp a		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 utjes/CaCbCp u			ts:NN2r	
SFX Ye 0 utjes-/CaCbCp u		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 otjes/CaCbCp o			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 otjes-/CaCbCp o		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 etjes/CaCbCp i			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 etjes-/CaCbCp i		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye é eetjes/CaCbCp é		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye é eetjes-/CaCbCp é		ts:NN2r

# bal=>balletje
SFX Yf Y 27
SFX Yf 0 betje b			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 getje g			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 ketje k			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 letje l			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 metje m			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 netje n			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 petje p			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 retje r			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 setje s			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 betjes/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 getjes/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 ketjes/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 letjes/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 metjes/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 netjes/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 petjes/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 retjes/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 setjes/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 betjes-/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 getjes-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 ketjes-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 letjes-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 metjes-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 netjes-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 petjes-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 retjes-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 setjes-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2r

# AOW=>AOW'tje
SFX Yg Y 2
SFX Yg 0 'tje .				ts:NN1r
SFX Yg 0 'tjes .			ts:NN2r

# FLAGS FOR PLURALS (COMPOUNDING END)
# team=>teams
SFX Za Y 1
SFX Za 0 s .				ts:NN2

# ium => iums, ia, icus->ici
SFX Zu Y 4
SFX Zu 0 s ium
SFX Zu ium ia ium			ts:NN2
SFX Zu icus ici icus			ts:NN2
SFX Zu icus ica icus			ts:NN2

# tuin=>tuinen
SFX Zb Y 4
SFX Zb 0 en/CaCbCp [^eo]		ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 ën/CaCbCp [eo]			ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 en-/CaCbCp [^eo]		ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 ën-/CaCbCp [eo]		ts:NN2

# auto=>auto's, cd => cd's
SFX Zc Y 1
SFX Zc 0 's .				ts:NN2

# schoonheid=>schoonheden
SFX Zd Y 2
SFX Zd heid heden/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2
SFX Zd heid heden-/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2

# tas=>tassen
SFX Ze Y 24
SFX Ze 0 ben/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 fen/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 sen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ben-/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 fen-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 len-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 sen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
